District of Columbia statutes.
6-321.07

Not considered a local grant-in-aid.

No transfer or donation of any interest in real property under the authority of this subchapter shall constitute a local grant-in-aid in connection with any urban renewal project being undertaken with federal assistance under title I of the Housing Act of 1949, as amended.

History

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 872, Pub. L. 86-736, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-828.
1973 Ed., § 5-726.

References in Text

Title I of the Housing Act of 1949, as amended, referred to in this section, is the Act of July 15, 1949, 63 Stat. 413, ch. 338.